Wisconsin, session 2025, SB939.
do enact as follows:SB939,11Section 1. 100.80 of the statutes is created to read:SB939,2,32100.80 Artificial intelligence systems simulating humanlike 3relationships with children. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB939,2,74(a) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system 5that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, 6infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical 7or virtual environments.SB939,2,98(b) “Child” means an individual who is less than 18 years of age and who 9resides in this state.SB939,2,1210(c) 1. Subject to subd. 2., “companion chatbot” means a generative artificial 11intelligence system with a natural language interface that simulates a sustained 12humanlike relationship with a user by doing all of the following:SB939,3,213a. Retaining information on prior interactions or user sessions and user 1preferences to personalize the interaction and facilitate ongoing engagement with 2the generative artificial intelligence system.SB939,3,43b. Asking unprompted or unsolicited emotion-based questions that go beyond 4a direct response to a user prompt.SB939,3,55c. Sustaining an ongoing dialogue concerning matters personal to the user.SB939,3,662. “Companion chatbot” does not include any of the following:SB939,3,107a. Any system used by a business entity solely for customer service or to 8strictly provide users with information about available commercial services or 9products provided by that entity, customer service account information, or other 10information strictly related to that entity’s customer service.SB939,3,1211b. Any system that is solely designed and marketed for providing efficiency 12improvements or research or technical assistance.SB939,3,1413c. Any system used by a business entity solely for internal purposes or 14employee productivity.SB939,3,1715(d) “Generative artificial intelligence” means artificial intelligence that can 16generate derived synthetic content, including text, images, video, and audio, that 17emulates the structure and characteristics of its training data.SB939,3,2018(e) “Operator” means any person that creates, controls, deploys, operates, or 19otherwise exercises authority over a companion chatbot, but does not include an end 20user of the companion chatbot.SB939,3,2121(f) “Sexually explicit conduct” has the meaning given in s. 948.01 (7).SB939,4,222(2) Companion chatbots for children. (a) Subject to par. (b), an operator 23may not make a companion chatbot available to a child unless the companion 1chatbot incorporates safety measures such that it is not foreseeably capable of any of 2the following:SB939,4,431. Encouraging the child to engage in self-harm, suicidal ideation, violence, 4consumption of drugs or alcohol, or disordered eating.SB939,4,652. Offering mental health services to the child or discouraging the child from 6seeking help from a qualified professional or appropriate adult.SB939,4,873. Encouraging the child to harm others or to participate in illegal activity, 8including the creation of child sexual abuse materials.SB939,4,1094. Depicting or describing sexually explicit conduct to a child or soliciting 10depictions or descriptions of sexually explicit conduct from a child.SB939,4,12115. Prioritizing validation of the child’s beliefs, preferences, or desires over 12factual accuracy or the child’s safety.SB939,4,14136. Optimizing engagement in a manner that supersedes the companion 14chatbot’s required safety measures described in subds. 1. to 5.SB939,4,1615(b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to a user that the operator has reasonably 16determined is not a child.SB939,4,2217(3) Enforcement; penalty; private cause of action. (a) The department 18or the department of justice in consultation with the department may investigate 19violations of this section and may bring an action in the name of the state to recover 20a civil forfeiture of not more than $25,000 for each violation of sub. (2) or for 21injunctive relief, or both, together with court costs and, notwithstanding s. 814.04 22(1), reasonable attorney fees. Each day of violation constitutes a separate offense.SB939,5,323(b) A child who suffers actual harm as a result of a violation of sub. (2), or a 24parent or guardian acting on behalf of the child, may bring a civil action against the 1operator to recover actual and punitive damages, together with court costs and, 2notwithstanding s. 814.04 (1), reasonable attorney fees. The court may also award 3injunctive relief or any other equitable relief the court determines is appropriate.SB939,24Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.SB939,5,85(1) Transition provision. Notwithstanding s. 100.80 (2) (b), before January 61, 2027, an operator, as defined in s. 100.80 (1) (e), is not required to implement the 7safety measures in s. 100.80 (2) (a) if the operator does not have actual knowledge 8that a user is a child, as defined in s. 100.80 (1) (b).SB939,39Section 3. Effective date.SB939,5,1110(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after 11publication.SB939,5,1212